Washington statutes.
RCW 9.46.0261

"Member," "bona fide member."

"Member" and "bona fide member," as used in this chapter, mean a person accepted for membership in an organization eligible to be licensed by the commission under this chapter upon application, with such action being recorded in the official minutes of a regular meeting or who has held full and regular membership status in the organization for a period of not less than twelve consecutive months prior to participating in the management or operation of any gambling activity. Such membership must in no way be dependent upon, or in any way related to, the payment of consideration to participate in any gambling activity.

Member or bona fide member shall include only members of an organization's specific chapter or unit licensed by the commission or otherwise actively conducting the gambling activity: PROVIDED, That:

(1) Members of chapters or local units of a state, regional or national organization may be considered members of the parent organization for the purpose of a gambling activity conducted by the parent organization, if the rules of the parent organization so permit;

(2) Members of a bona fide auxiliary to a principal organization may be considered members of the principal organization for the purpose of a gambling activity conducted by the principal organization. Members of the principal organization may also be considered members of its auxiliary for the purpose of a gambling activity conducted by the auxiliary; and

(3) Members of any chapter or local unit within the jurisdiction of the next higher level of the parent organization, and members of a bona fide auxiliary to that chapter or unit, may assist any other chapter or local unit of that same organization licensed by the commission in the conduct of gambling activities.

No person shall be a member of any organization if that person's primary purpose for membership is to become, or continue to be, a participant in, or an operator or manager of, any gambling activity or activities.

[ 1987 c 4 s 16. Formerly RCW 9.46.020(15).]